Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2431
Community health center; relabeling and redispensing prescription drugs; requirements.

(1) Prescription drugs or devices which have been delivered to a community health center for dispensing to a patient of such health center pursuant to a valid prescription, but which are not dispensed or administered to such patient, may be delivered to a pharmacist or pharmacy under contract with the community health center for relabeling and redispensing to another patient of such health center pursuant to a valid prescription if:

(a) The decision to accept delivery of the drug or device for relabeling and redispensing rests solely with the contracting pharmacist or pharmacy;

(b) The drug or device has been in the control of the community health center at all times;

(c) The drug or device is in the original and unopened labeled container with a tamper-evident seal intact. Such container shall bear the expiration date or calculated expiration date and lot number; and

(d) The relabeling and redispensing is not otherwise prohibited by law.

(2) For purposes of this section:

(a) Administer has the definition found in section 38-2806;

(b) Calculated expiration date has the definition found in section 38-2884;

(c) Community health center means a community health center established pursuant to the Health Centers Consolidation Act of 1996, 42 U.S.C. 201 et seq., as such act existed on May 7, 2005;

(d) Deliver or delivery has the definition found in section 38-2813;

(e) Dispense or dispensing has the definition found in section 38-2817;

(f) Prescription has the definition found in section 38-2840; and

(g) Prescription drug or device has the definition found in section 38-2841.

(3) The Department of Health and Human Services, in consultation with the Board of Pharmacy, may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out this section.

Laws 2005, LB 382, § 14;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 542;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1201.